da: Form på origamipapir: Blandede former; Cirkel; Hjerte; Rektangel; Kvadrat; Stjerne; Trekant; Andet
pl: Shapes Paper origami: Różne kształty; Koło; Serce; Prostokąt; Kwadrat; Gwiazda; Trójkąt; Inne
ru: Форма бумаги для оригами: Ассорти форм; Круг; Сердце; Прямоугольник; Квадрат; Звезда; Треугольник; Другое
lt-LT: Origami popieriaus forma: Įvairios formos; Apskritimas; Širdis; Stačiakampis; Kvadratas; Žvaigždė; Trikampis; Kita
es: Forma del papel para origami: Formas surtidas; Círculo; Corazón; Rectángulo; Cuadrado; Estrella; Triángulo; Otro
pt-BR: Papel de origami formato: Formatos variados; Círculo; Coração; Retângulo; Quadrado; Estrela; Triângulo; Outros
pt-PT: Forma do papel de origami: Formas variadas; Círculo; Coração; Retângulo; Quadrado; Estrela; Triângulo; Outra
ro-RO: Forma hârtiei de origami: Forme asortate; Cerc; Inimă; Dreptunghi; Pătrat; Stea; Triunghi; Altele
nb: Origami-papirform: Forskjellige former; Sirkel; Hjerte; Rektangel; Kvadrat; Stjerne; Trekant; Annet
zh-TW: 摺紙紙張形狀: 各種形狀; 圓形; 心形; 長方形; 正方形; 星形; 三角形; 其他
hr-HR: Oblik origami papira: Različiti oblici; Krug; Srce; Pravokutnik; Kvadrat; Zvijezda; Trokut; Ostalo
vi: Hình dạng giấy origami: Nhiều hình dạng; Hình tròn; Trái tim; Hình chữ nhật; Hình vuông; Hình ngôi sao; Hình tam giác; Khác
fr: Forme du papier pour origami: Formes assorties; Cercle; Cœur; Rectangle; Carré; Étoile; Triangle; Autre
nl: Origamipapier vorm: Diverse vormen; Cirkel; Hart; Rechthoek; Vierkant; Ster; Driehoek; Overige
th: Shapes Paper โอริกามิ: รูปทรงคละแบบ; วงกลม; หัวใจ; สี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; สี่เหลี่ยมจัตุรัส; ดาว; สามเหลี่ยม; อื่นๆ
fi: Origamipaperin muoto: Lajitelma muotoja; Ympyrä; Sydän; Suorakulmio; Neliö; Tähti; Kolmio; Muu
zh-CN: 折纸用纸形状: 混合形状; 圆形; 心形; 长方形; 正方形; 星形; 三角形; 其他
tr: Origami kâğıdı şekli: Çeşitli şekiller; Daire; Kalp; Dikdörtgen; Kare; Yıldız; Üçgen; Diğer
cs: Tvar papíru pro origami: Různé tvary; Kruh; Srdce; Obdélník; Čtverec; Hvězda; Trojúhelník; Ostatní
hu: Origamipapír alakja: Különféle formák; Kör; Szív; Téglalap; Négyzet; Csillag; Háromszög; Egyéb
sl-SI: Oblika origami papirja: Različne oblike; Krog; Srce; Pravokotnik; Kvadrat; Zvezda; Trikotnik; Drugo
sk-SK: Tvar hárka na origami: Rôzne tvary; Kruh; Srdce; Obdĺžnik; Štvorec; Hviezda; Trojuholník; Iné
sv: Origamipapper – form: Olika former; Cirkel; Hjärta; Rektangel; Kvadrat; Stjärna; Triangel; Övrigt
ko: 종이접기 용지 모양: 혼합 모양; 원형; 하트형; 직사각형; 정사각형; 별형; 삼각형; 기타
de: Form des Origamipapiers: Verschiedene Formen; Kreis; Herz; Rechteck; Quadrat; Stern; Dreieck; Sonstige
el: Shapes Paper Origami: Διάφορα σχήματα; Κύκλος; Καρδιά; Ορθογώνιο; Τετράγωνο; Αστέρι; Τρίγωνο; Άλλο
it: Forma della carta origami: Forme assortite; Cerchio; Cuore; Rettangolo; Quadrato; Stella; Triangolo; Altro
ja: 折り紙Shapes: 複数の形状; 円形; ハート形; 長方形; 正方形; 星形; 三角形; その他
bg-BG: Форма на оригами хартията: Различни форми; Кръг; Сърце; Правоъгълник; Квадрат; Звезда; Триъгълник; Друго
en: Origami paper shape: Assorted shapes; Circle; Heart; Rectangle; Square; Star; Triangle; Other